Massachusetts, session 194th, H3879.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Paragraph 2 of subsection (a) of section 2 of chapter 62 of the General
Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following
subparagraph:-
(R) income received by a prisoner of war, defined as a person having been regularly
appointed, enrolled, enlisted or inducted into the military forces of the United States and having
been captured, separated and incarcerated by an enemy of the United States during an armed
conflict; and provided further, that the exemption pursuant to this paragraph shall be allowed for
the lifetime of the prisoner of war.
of 1